New York, session 2025-2026, S10495.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 16 of the alcoholic beverage control law, as 2 amended by chapter 731 of the laws of 1971, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 § 16. Disqualification of members and employees of authority. No 5 member of the authority or any officer, deputy, assistant, inspector or 6 employee thereof shall have any interest, direct or indirect, either 7 proprietary or by means of any loan, mortgage or lien, or in any other 8 manner, in or on any premises where alcoholic beverages are manufactured 9 or sold; nor shall [he] they have any interest, direct or indirect, in 10 any business wholly or partially devoted to the manufacture, sale, 11 transportation or storage of alcoholic beverages, or own any stock in 12 any corporation which has any interest, proprietary or otherwise, direct 13 or indirect, in any premises where alcoholic beverages are manufactured 14 or sold, or in any business wholly or partially devoted to the manufac- 15 ture, sale, transportation or storage of alcoholic beverages, or receive 16 any commission or profit whatsoever, direct or indirect, from any person 17 applying for or receiving any license or permit provided for in this 18 chapter, or hold any other public office in the state or in any poli- 19 tical subdivision except upon the written permission of the liquor 20 authority, such member of the authority or officer, deputy, assistant, 21 inspector or employee thereof may hold the public office of notary 22 public or member of a [community] board of education [in the city school 23 district of the city of New York]. [Any one] Anyone who violates any of 24 the provisions of this section shall be removed. 25 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15621-03-6